Missouri, session 2026, HB3151.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 144.014, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 144.014, to read as follows:
144.014. 1. Notwithstanding other provisions of law to the contrary, beginning
October 1, 1997, the tax levied and imposed under this chapter on all retail sales of food shall
be at the rate of one percent. The revenue derived from the one percent rate pursuant to this
section shall be deposited by the state treasurer in the school district trust fund and shall be
distributed as provided in section 144.701.
2. For the purposes of this section, the term "food" shall include only those products
and types of food for which [food stamps] benefits may be redeemed pursuant to the
provisions of the [Federal Food Stamp] Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program as
[contained] described in 7 U.S.C. Section 2012, as that section now reads or as it may be
amended hereafter, and shall include food dispensed by or through vending machines and all
dietary and nutritional supplements. For the purpose of this section, the term "dietary
and nutritional supplements" shall have the same meaning as the term "dietary
supplements" as defined under 21 U.S.C. Section 321(ff). For the purpose of this section,
except for vending machine sales, the term "food" shall not include food or drink sold by any
establishment where the gross receipts derived from the sale of food prepared by such
establishment for immediate consumption on or off the premises of the establishment
constitutes more than eighty percent of the total gross receipts of that establishment,
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3151 2
regardless of whether such prepared food is consumed on the premises of that establishment,
including, but not limited to, sales of food by any restaurant, fast food restaurant, delicatessen,
eating house, or café.
✔